Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. United States Congress.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

77 Am. Jur. 2d, United States, §§ 9 — 10.

91 C.J.S., United States, §§ 9 — 16.

State court jurisdiction over contest involving primary election for member of Congress. 68 ALR2d 1320.

Sec. 15.30.110.
Provisions for election of United States senators.

A United States senator shall be elected at the general election held in the year 1960 and at the general election every sixth year thereafter.
A United States senator shall be elected at the general election held in the year 1962 and at the general election every sixth year thereafter.

History.

(§ 6.31 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.30.120.
Provisions for election of United States representatives.

A United States representative in Congress shall be elected from each congressional district at the general election in 1960 and at the general election every second year thereafter.

History.

(§ 6.32 ch 83 SLA 1960)